Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska4-110
Public benefits;
verification of lawful presence; exemptions;
legislative findings.

Verification of
lawful presence in the United States pursuant to section 4-108 is not required
for:

(1) Any purpose for which lawful presence in the United States
is not restricted by law, ordinance, or regulation;

(2) Assistance for health care services and products, not
related to an organ transplant procedure, that are necessary for the treatment
of an emergency medical condition, including emergency labor and delivery,
manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity, including severe
pain, such that the absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably
be expected to result in (a) placing the patient's health in serious jeopardy,
(b) serious impairment to bodily functions, or (c) serious dysfunction of
any bodily organ or part;

(3) Short-term, noncash, in-kind emergency disaster relief;

(4) Public health assistance for immunizations with respect
to diseases and for testing and treatment of symptoms of communicable diseases,
whether or not such symptoms are caused by a communicable disease; or

(5) Programs, services, or assistance necessary for the protection
of life or safety, such as soup kitchens, crisis counseling and intervention,
and short-term shelter, which (a) deliver in-kind services at the community
level, including those which deliver such services through public or private,
nonprofit agencies and (b) do not condition the provision of assistance, the
amount of assistance provided, or the cost of assistance provided on the income
or resources of the recipient.

The Legislature
finds that unborn children do not have immigration status and therefor are
not within the scope of section 4-108. Prenatal care services available pursuant
to sections 68-915 and 68-972 to unborn children, whose eligibility is independent
of the mother's eligibility status, shall not be deemed to be tied to the
immigration status of the mother and therefor are not included in the restrictions
imposed by section 4-108.

Laws 2009, LB403, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB599, § 1.